Utah statutes.
17-28-11.   Temporary work -- Term or period.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), the head of any county fire department coming within the provisions of this act may with the advice and consent of the county legislative body, appoint to any position or place of employment in the fire department, any person for temporary work without making the appointment from the certified civil service list.

(2)  An appointment described in Subsection (1) may not be longer than one month in the aggregate in the same calendar year.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

